Utah statutes.
31A-42-203.   Powers and duties of board.
(1)  The board shall have the power to:
(a)  enter into contracts to carry out the provisions and purposes of this
chapter, including, with the approval of the commissioner, contracts with
persons or other organizations for the performance of administrative
functions;
(b)  sue or be sued, including taking legal action necessary to implement and
enforce the plan for risk adjustment adopted pursuant to this chapter; and
(c)  establish appropriate rate adjustments, underwriting policies, and other
actuarial functions appropriate to the operation of the defined contribution
arrangement market in accordance with Section 31A-42-202.
(2) (a)  The board shall prepare and submit an annual report to the department
for inclusion in the department's annual market report, which shall include:
(i)  the expenses of administration of the risk adjuster for the defined
contribution arrangement market;
(ii)  a description of the types of policies sold in the defined contribution
arrangement market;
(iii)  the number of insured lives in the defined contribution arrangement
market; and
(iv)  the number of insured lives in health benefit plans that do not include
state mandates.
(b)  The budget for operation of the risk adjuster is subject to the approval
of the board.
(c)  The administrative budget of the board and the commissioner under this
chapter shall comply with the requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary
Procedures Act, and is subject to review and approval by the Legislature.
(3)  The board shall report to the Health Reform Task Force and to the
Legislative Management Committee prior to October 1, 2009 and again prior to
October 1, 2010 regarding:
(a)  the board's progress in developing the plan required by this chapter; and
(b)  the board's progress in:
(i)  expanding choice of plans in the defined contribution market; and
(ii)  expanding access to the defined contribution market in the Internet
portal for large employer groups.
